Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2404.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6669YH (2) 91 mb/md H.F. 2404 Section 1. Section 39.2, subsection 4, paragraph d, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 d. (1) For any political subdivision of this state that 3 is not a school district , if the special election is in 4 whole or in part for the question of issuing bonds or other 5 indebtedness, the first Tuesday after the first Monday in 6 November. 7 (2) For a school district, if the special election is in 8 whole or in part for the question of issuing bonds or other 9 indebtedness, the first Tuesday after the first Monday in 10 November of each even-numbered year. 11